California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
 certified by the district to the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, or the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(c) The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges and the Superintendent of Public Instruction, as appropriate, shall certify this information to the Director of Finance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1568, Sec. 7.   Effective September 30, 1990.   Operative October 1, 1990, by Sec. 15 of Ch. 1568.)
-------------------------------------------

11329.5.

With respect to paragraph (7) of subdivision (b) of Section 11320.3 and Section 11325.71, the Legislature finds and declares all of the following, but only for the operative period of these added provisions:

(a) Due to the significant General Fund revenue decline for the 2009–10 fiscal year, funding has been reduced for the CalWORKs program.

(b) Due to the federal funding available under the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 (Public Law 111-5) (ARRA) for CalWORKs grants, reductions in 2009–10 are being achieved in the county single allocation.

(c) Reduced funding,
 including a three-hundred-seventy-five-million-dollar ($375,000,000) reduction
 to the county single allocation in the 2009–10 and 2010–11 Budget Acts, and increased caseload for CalWORKs will result in insufficient resources to provide the full range of welfare-to-work services in the 2009–10 and 2010–11 fiscal years.

(d) Reduced funding, including a three hundred seventy-six million eight hundred fifty thousand dollar ($376,850,000) reduction to the county single allocation in the 2011–12 Budget Act, will result in insufficient resources to provide the full range of welfare-to-work services in the 2011–12 fiscal year.

(e) Reduced funding, including a reduction to the county single allocation, for the period between July 1, 2012, until January 1, 2015, will result in insufficient resources to provide the full range of welfare-to-work services
 during that time period.

(f) It is the intent of the Legislature that the limited resources for CalWORKs services be effectively utilized, as established in paragraph (7) of subdivision (b) of Section 11320.3.

(g) It is the further intent of the Legislature to provide additional flexibility to address funding constraints, as established in Section 11325.71, in addition to the existing flexibility provided under subdivision (f) of Section 11320.3.

(h) It is the further intent of the Legislature to minimize disruption of welfare-to-work services for individuals already participating, and prioritize exemptions and good cause for applicants.

(i) Funding and
 caseload factors will result in circumstances beyond the control of the counties in the 2009–10, 2010–11, and 2011–12 fiscal years, and relief should be provided for federal penalties that may result.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 47, Sec. 21.   (SB 1041)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.3. CalWORKs Housing Support [11330. - 11330.5.]

11330.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Stable housing is a fundamental component of self-sufficiency and child well-being.

(b) According to the National Alliance to End Homelessness, residential stability is a necessary precursor to effectively addressing barriers that inhibit self-sufficiency, and research is clear that children who lack safe and stable housing demonstrate worse academic and social outcomes.

(c) Housing support in the CalWORKs program is minimal and families struggle to find and retain safe, affordable, and stable housing.

(d) Expanding homeless and housing support in the CalWORKs program would help meet a critical need for families working to achieve self-sufficiency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 29, Sec. 70.   (SB 855)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

11330.5.

(a) The department shall award funds in accordance with subdivision (e) to counties for the purpose of providing CalWORKs housing supports to CalWORKs recipients who are experiencing homelessness or at risk of homelessness, including recipients who have not yet received an eviction notice, and for whom housing instability would be a barrier to self-sufficiency or child well-being.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), this section does not create an entitlement to housing supports, which are intended to be a service to CalWORKs families and not a form of assistance, to be provided to families at the discretion of the county.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that housing supports provided pursuant to this article utilize evidence-based models, including those established in the federal Department of Housing and Urban Development’s Homeless Prevention and Rapid Re-Housing Program. Supports provided may include, but shall not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Financial assistance, including rental assistance, security deposits, utility payments, moving cost
 assistance, and motel and hotel vouchers.

(2) Housing stabilization and relocation, including outreach and engagement, landlord recruitment, case management, housing search and placement, legal services, and credit repair.

(d) The asset limit threshold specified in subdivision (f) of Section 11450 shall not be used to determine a family’s eligibility for receipt of housing supports provided pursuant to this article.

(e) Funds appropriated for purposes of this article shall be awarded to participating counties by the State Department of Social Services according to criteria developed by the department in consultation with the County Welfare Directors Association and Housing California.

(f) The department, in consultation with the County Welfare Directors
 Association and Housing California and other stakeholders, shall develop each of the following:

(1) The criteria by which counties may be awarded funds to provide housing supports to eligible CalWORKs recipients pursuant to this article.

(2) The proportion of funding to be expended on reasonable and appropriate administrative activities to minimize overhead and maximize services.

(3) Tracking and reporting procedures.

(g) The department, in consultation with appropriate legislative staff and the County Welfare Directors Association, shall determine, in a manner that reflects the legislative intent for the use of these funds and that is most beneficial to the overall CalWORKs program, whether housing supports provided with this funding are considered to
 be assistance or nonassistance payments.

(h) Counties may continue to provide housing supports under this section to a recipient who is discontinued because the recipient no longer meets the income eligibility requirements of Section 11450.12.

(i) (1) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement and administer the changes made to this section by the act that added this subdivision by means of all-county letters or similar instructions from the department that shall have the same force and effect as regulations until regulations are adopted.

(2) The department shall adopt regulations implementing the changes specified in paragraph (1) no later than July 1, 2024.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 85, Sec. 33.   (AB 135)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.4. CalWORKs Home Visiting Initiative Program [11330.6. - 11330.9.]

11330.6.

(a) (1) The Legislature hereby establishes the CalWORKs Home Visiting Program as a voluntary program for the purpose of supporting positive health, development, and well-being outcomes for pregnant and parenting people, families, and infants born into poverty, expanding their future educational, economic, and financial capability opportunities, and improving the likelihood that they will exit poverty.

(2) The program shall provide high-quality, evidence-based, culturally competent services to pregnant people, parents or caretaker relatives, and children that meet the needs of at-risk assistance units, including those in underserved, rural, tribal, impoverished, and other communities. The services provided under this article shall not exceed the duration of the applicable home visiting model.

(b) Subject to an appropriation in the annual Budget Act, the department shall award funds to participating counties for the purposes of this article in order to provide voluntary evidence-based home visiting services to any assistance unit that meets the requirements of this article. Services authorized pursuant to this section are not entitlement services and participating counties may limit the
 number of families participating in the program to ensure that the costs do not exceed the amount of funds awarded to the county for this purpose. Funding awarded for the purpose of home visiting services provided under this article shall not supplant expenditures from any other existing funding sources subject to county control for home visiting services. Funding appropriated may be used in combination with funding from other sources if the entirety of services provided meet the award requirements of the program.

(c) (1) Participation in the program established in this article is optional for counties, and counties that apply for, and are awarded, funds shall agree to the terms of this article. A county’s application for funding shall describe all of the following:

(A) How
 the program’s purposes, as specified in subdivision (a), will be accomplished.

(B) How the county will integrate and coordinate the evidence-based home visiting programs with county workers and core CalWORKs services to maximize the utilization of those services provided to CalWORKs recipients.

(C) How the county consulted with existing home visiting programs, if applicable.

(D) The county’s plan to recruit and retain home visitors that reflect the population of its CalWORKs program.

(E) The voluntary population of CalWORKs applicants and recipients the county intends to serve, which shall include those populations identified in paragraph (2).

(2) A voluntary participant shall meet both of the following criteria:

(A) The individual is one of the following:

(i) A member of a CalWORKs assistance unit.

(ii) The parent or caretaker relative for a child-only case.

(iii) An individual who is apparently eligible for CalWORKs aid.

(B) (i) The individual is pregnant or the individual is a parent or caretaker relative of a child less than
 24 months of age at the time the individual enrolls in the program.

(ii) A county may serve additional individuals not described in clause (i) with departmental approval (For example, parents or caretaker relatives of children younger than 36 months of age at the time of enrollment).

(3) The department shall work with counties to develop the outreach and engagement process that will effectively reach the priority populations.

(4) The county shall demonstrate in its application to the department how services will
 be designed and provided as specified in Section 11330.7.

(d) (1) Participation in the program for eligible assistance units shall not be considered a condition of CalWORKs eligibility and this shall be explained in the document required pursuant to paragraph (2).

(2) Participation in the program shall be offered in writing to an eligible parent or caretaker relative. A document that includes a description of the program, its
 anticipated benefits and duration, a description of how to opt into the home visiting program, and a description of how to terminate participation shall be given to the parent or caretaker relative. Other forms of outreach are permitted and encouraged.

(3) An assistance unit agreeing to receive services under this article need not be eligible for, nor shall be required to participate in, the welfare-to-work program established pursuant to Article 3.2 (commencing with Section 11320). If an assistance unit elects to participate in the welfare-to-work program, the scheduled hours to be spent directly with the home visitor shall count toward allowable activities under a welfare-to-work plan.

(4) Participation in this program shall not affect a family’s application for aid nor
 eligibility for any other CalWORKs benefits, supports, or services, including, but not limited to, welfare-to-work exemptions pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 11320.3, good cause for not participating pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 11320.3, participating in housing support services pursuant to Article 3.3 (commencing with Section 11330), or participating in family stabilization pursuant to Section 11325.24.

(5) If the parent or assisted caretaker has been removed from the assistance unit or exits the CalWORKs program, voluntary home visiting services may continue for up to 12 months or until completion of the evidence-based home visiting
 program, whichever is sooner, or until the parent or assisted caretaker relative terminates their own participation.

(6) A county and the home visiting program may incorporate participation of the noncustodial parent of a child who is a member of a CalWORKs assistance unit into home visiting services, subject to the mutual agreement of the custodial and noncustodial parents.

(e) The following definitions shall apply for purposes of this
 article:

(1) “Cultural competence” means the ability to interact effectively with people of different cultures.

(2) “Evidence-based home visiting” means a home visiting model approved by the department, which shall be evaluated considering criteria developed by the United States Department of Health and Human Services for evidence-based home visiting.

(3) “Home” means a temporary or permanent residence or living space, or another location identified by the assistance unit.

(f) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the
 Government Code), the department may implement and administer the changes made to this section by the act that added this subdivision by means of all-county letters or similar instructions from the department that shall have the same force and effect as regulations until regulations are adopted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 376, Sec. 1.   (AB 607)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

11330.7.

(a) A primary component of the program described in this article shall be case management and evidence-based home visiting for the purpose of family support, which shall commence upon the determination that an individual is eligible in accordance with paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 11330.6 and shall continue until the eligible individual completes the evidence-based home visiting program or terminates the individual’s own participation.

(b) Home visiting shall include, but not be limited to, resources and referrals to all of the following:

(1) Prenatal, infant, and toddler care.

(2) Infant and child nutrition.

(3) Developmental screening and assessments.

(4) Parent education, parent and child interaction, child development, and child care.

(5) Job readiness and barrier removal.

(6) Domestic violence and sexual assault, mental health, and substance abuse treatment, as applicable.

(c) Home visitors shall encourage participants to enroll their child in a high-quality, early learning setting, or participate in playgroups, or other child enrichment activities, as appropriate, and parent participation in this early learning setting shall count towards allowable activities under a welfare-to-work plan developed by the parent or caretaker relative under Section 11325.21.

(d) Home visiting services shall only be those intended to achieve the goals established in subdivision (a) of Section 11330.6 and that are provided in the home of an assistance unit or at a location agreed upon by the parent or caretaker relative and the home visitor. Home visiting services shall only be provided by a registered nurse, nurse practitioner, social worker, or other person able to provide culturally appropriate services who is trained and certified according to the requirements of this article, has completed a background check, and has completed training as specified in subdivision (g) for the purposes of implementing this article.

(e) Home visiting services and visits shall not be mandatory, random, or unannounced.

(f) Counties may give preferential treatment to contractors of home visiting programs that
 are able to colocate home visitors and CalWORKs caseworkers in order to facilitate communication and coordination.

(g) (1) All home visiting providers shall complete training in the following areas before providing services to a CalWORKs recipient:

(A) (i) CalWORKs, Medi-Cal, CalFresh, California Special Supplemental Nutrition Program for Women, Infants, and Children (WIC), and other programs, with county-specific information about how the home visiting professionals can help a parent access additional services for which the parent may be eligible and troubleshoot problems with benefits or eligibility that would impact the parent’s access to services.

(ii) This training shall be administered by the county and shall include, but not be limited to, the demographics of the
 population served and the supports and services available for CalWORKs recipients.

(iii) Any costs incurred shall be funded as part of the allocation from the department to that county.

(B) (i) Cultural competency and implicit bias.

(ii) It is the responsibility of the contractor to ensure that all home visitors have received implicit bias and cultural competency trainings. The department shall establish the minimum training standards as required in this section.

(iii) Contractors are encouraged to partner with local organizations to develop a curriculum that best suits the needs of the home visiting program participants.

(C) (i) Strengths-based
 practices for working with families with unmet needs.

(ii) Either the contracted provider or the county shall administer this training.

(2) A county that staffs its home visiting program solely with county staff is exempt from the requirements of paragraph (1) to the extent the training would duplicate training already received.

(h) Counties, in coordination with home visitors and CalWORKs staff, may establish processes to provide one-time, as-needed funding for the purchase of material goods for a program participant’s household related to care, health, and safety of the child and family, which shall not exceed
 one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 50, Sec. 43.   (SB 187)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

11330.8.

(a) For the purpose of implementing this article, the department shall form and consult with a workgroup of stakeholders, including legislative staff, representatives of counties and county human services agencies, CalWORKs eligibility workers, home visitors with experience serving CalWORKs recipients, current or former CalWORKs clients, advocates for clients, local and state First 5 representatives, the State Department of Health Care Services, the State Department of Public Health, home visiting program administrators, home visiting program experts and advocates, and other stakeholders. The workgroup shall be maintained indefinitely to provide continuous quality improvement, utilizing the data collected and received pursuant to subdivision (c), and shall biennially provide technical assistance to county home visiting
 programs.

(b) The department shall convene counties with participating home visiting programs to gather twice annually, beginning April 1, 2019, to share challenges, lessons learned, and best practices. These meetings shall be open to all stakeholders described in subdivision (a).

(c) The department shall collect, and counties and participating home visitation organizations shall provide, as a condition of funding, data necessary to administer the program and also related to the outcomes of participants and children, including by race, ethnicity, national origin, primary and secondary language, and county. The data shall include program outcomes for the parents and children served in the program and these data components shall be identified in consultation with the stakeholder workgroup referenced in subdivision (a), and pursuant to subdivision (d). All state, county, and other
 participating organizations shall protect the personal information of individuals and families collected or maintained against loss, unauthorized access, and illegal use or disclosure, consistent with applicable state and federal laws.

(d) (1) The department shall work with at least one independent, research-based institution to identify existing, and establish additional, outcome measurements. The Legislature shall be consulted as part of the outcomes measurement development process. These measurements shall inform an evaluation report that shall be provided to the Legislature no later than January 10, 2022. The evaluation shall include program outcomes for the parents and children served in the program, models utilized, and measures specific to CalWORKs objectives. Notwithstanding any other law, the department may accept and expend funds from nongovernment sources for the evaluation, for a longitudinal study of the home
 visiting program that is in addition to the evaluation, or for both. The report shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following information, with respect to the period of evaluation:

(A) Rates of children receiving regular well-child checkups and, if available, immunization rates according to the American Academy of Pediatrics Bright Futures guidelines.

(B) Rates of children receiving developmental screening and referrals for further assessment.

(C) Rates of participation in early learning programs.

(D) Service referrals by type.

(E) Services accessed by type.

(F) Number of home visits completed, including data on
 duration of families’ enrollment in home visiting services.

(G) Parental satisfaction with their gains in parenting skills and knowledge.

(H) Food and housing stability.

(I) Workforce training, employment, and financial stability.

(J) Participation in educational programs or English as a second language programs, or both, as applicable.

(K) Access to immigration services and remedies.

(L) Indicators of home visiting program workforce capacity, including demographics, characteristics, composition, including employer and certification status, and future training needs of the home visiting workforce.

(M) Child welfare referrals and outcomes.

(N) Additional descriptive and outcome indicators, as appropriate.

(2) The requirement for submitting a report pursuant to paragraph (1) is inoperative on January 10, 2026, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 308.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

11330.9.

This article shall become operative on January 1, 2019.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 35, Sec. 19.   (AB 1811)   Effective June 27, 2018.   Note: This section makes Article 3.4, commencing with Section 11330.6, operative on January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.5. Cal-Learn Program [11331. - 11334.7.]

11331.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that the connection between teenage parenting and long-term welfare dependency has been well documented by recent social science research. An estimated 60 percent of teenage parents who are currently receiving welfare will have 10 or more years of dependency on aid. Average time on aid for teenage parents is significantly longer than for parents who begin families at an older age.

(b) The Legislature finds that teenage parents who receive assistance under the CalWORKs program have unique education, vocational, training, health, and other social service needs that are not specifically provided for as part of the welfare-to-work activities. Research shows that successful programs that help teenage parents achieve self-sufficiency contain the following features:

(1) A comprehensive range of health and social services.

(2) Adequate supportive services.

(3) A sympathetic and supportive program atmosphere.

(4) Individual attention, especially regarding education pace and plan.

(5) An open format and an extended period of program availability.

(6) Caring, nonjudgmental staff.

(7) Strong case management systems, including followup activities to determine whether a student is progressing in his or her studies.

(c) The Legislature declares that this article is intended to ensure that the GAIN program does all of the following:

(1) Provide the education and training services needed by teenage parents to help them earn a high school diploma or its equivalent, including vocational training and preparation that may be available through local education agencies.

(2) Link teenagers to other needed health and social services available in the community.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 902, Sec. 40.   Effective January 1, 1999.   As prescribed in former Section 11334.8, this section (as part of Article 3.5) resumed full operation on April 1, 2013, after a period of inoperation or limited operation.   Note: Former Section 11334.8 was last amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 439, before its repeal on April 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

11331.5.

(a) Recipients of aid under this chapter who are under 19 years of age, who are pregnant or custodial parents, shall be required to participate in the program, subject to both of the following requirements:

(1) The teen shall participate in the program until earning a high school diploma or its equivalent.

(2) The teen shall participate in the program as a student attending school on a full-time basis, as normally defined by the school in which the participant enrolls.

(b) A teen, as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (d),
 may continue to participate in the program provided for under this article. A teen participating under this article pursuant to this subdivision shall be eligible for the same benefits as is any individual required to participate in the program.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the county shall exempt a teen from the program, as verified by the county, subject to annual redetermination, when any of the following conditions occur:

(1) The teen is expelled from school and obtains verification that no other school in the district will permit the teen to attend, and the case manager cannot arrange for enrollment in an alternative school.

(2) The teen cannot receive payment for childcare or transportation expenses due to lack of program funding.

(3) Childcare is necessary and unavailable.

(4) Public or private transportation is necessary and unavailable.

(5) A foster care payment is made under this chapter on behalf of the teen.

(6) The teen has an illness, injury, or incapacity, as determined by a doctor’s verification, that substantially deprives the teen of the ability to meet program requirements or to be successful in earning a high school diploma or its equivalent, and an alternative education program cannot be arranged.

(7) The teen is in a situation or a crisis that is destabilizing their family, including, but not limited to, any of the following:

(A) Homelessness or imminent risk of homelessness.

(B) A lack of safety due to domestic violence.

(C) Untreated or undertreated behavioral and mental health needs.

(D) The
 misuse of controlled substances or alcohol.

(d) For the purposes of this article, “teen” or “teenage parent” means either of the following:

(1) A custodial parent or pregnant person under 19 years of age, who is required to participate pursuant to subdivision (a).

(2) A custodial parent or pregnant person 19 years of age who, prior to becoming 19 years of age, was participating in the program pursuant to subdivision (a), and who is otherwise eligible for voluntary continued participation in the program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 615, Sec. 5.   (SB 521)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

11331.7.

Counties shall arrange for the provision of education and supportive services that teenage parents need to successfully participate in the Cal-Learn Program. The county shall identify the need of each individual for, and the method of providing, the following services:

(a) Supportive services, including child care and transportation, as specified in Section 11323.2. Supportive services shall be limited to those that are necessary to enable the teenage parent to attend school regularly.

(b) Intensive case management services, as described in Section 11332.5.

(c) Any other services necessary for the teen parent to successfully participate in the Cal-Learn Program, that may include, but not be limited to, mental health services and substance abuse treatment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 902, Sec. 42.   Effective January 1, 1999.   As prescribed in former Section 11334.8, this section (as part of Article 3.5) resumed full operation on April 1, 2013, after a period of inoperation or limited operation.   Note: Former Section 11334.8 was last amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 439, before its repeal on April 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

11332.

(a) Participation by a teenage parent shall be deferred if the county determines that any of the services an individual is assessed as needing pursuant to Section 11331.7 are not available.

(b) Participation by a teenage parent shall be deferred so long as the individual has a special need that directly affects his or her ability to attend school or be successful in earning a high school diploma and the special need cannot be addressed. 

(c) Participation by a teenage parent shall be deferred after the birth of a child for a period of postpartum recovery as prescribed by a physician.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1252, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1994.   As prescribed in former Section 11334.8, this section (as part of Article 3.5) resumed full operation on April 1, 2013, after a period of inoperation or limited operation.   Note: Former Section 11334.8 was last amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 439, before its repeal on April 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

11332.5.

(a) Counties shall arrange for the provision of case management services and counseling to teenage parents to assist their participation in the Cal-Learn Program. Case management services shall include all of the following:

(1) Designing a realistic plan that assists in maximizing the ability of each client to graduate from high school or its equivalent and includes referrals to services that:

(A) Reduce the incidence of maternal and child morbidity and mortality, including the incidence of low birthweight infants.

(B) Enhance the teen’s parenting skills.

(C) Facilitate an effective ongoing relationship between the teenage parent, the noncustodial parent, and the child where it is in the best interest of the child and the teenage parent.

(D) Assess the suitability of the teenage parent’s living situation, including, but not limited to, the physical and emotional health and safety of the teenage parent and the child.

(2) Providing referrals to appropriate community services needed to assist the teenage parent’s return to school.

(3) Monitoring each client’s progress and making the necessary changes to improve the individual’s program.

(4) (A) Acting as a counselor, colleague, and role model so that each teenage parent has someone to trust and to turn to for advice, guidance, and ideas.

(B) Case managers should be prepared to provide intensive counseling during all phases of a teenage parent’s progress through the program.

(5) Ensuring that each teenage parent understands the program requirements and the consequences of not making adequate or satisfactory progress required under this article.

(b) Counties shall afford case managers assigned to assist teenage parents sufficient time to provide the needed case management services.

(c) (1) Case managers assigned to assist teenage parents shall possess an expertise in understanding the education, training, and other social and health service needs of teenage parents, as well as the local programs that provide these services.

(2) Each county, in conjunction with the department, shall provide training to persons assigned to work with teenage parents to develop the expertise required by paragraph (1).

(d) The county plan required by Section 11320.6 shall describe the way each county proposes to provide case management services to teenage parents.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1252, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1994.   As prescribed in former Section 11334.8, this section (as part of Article 3.5) resumed full operation on April 1, 2013, after a period of inoperation or limited operation.   Note: Former Section 11334.8 was last amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 439, before its repeal on April 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

11332.7.

(a) Notwithstanding Article 3.2 (commencing with Section 11320), there shall be no limits on the amount of time that a teen under 19 years of age may participate in the initial education components of the program in order to achieve a high school diploma or its equivalent.

(b) A teen who begins participation
 in the program before 19 years of age may continue to receive needed intensive case management services after 19 years of age until the individual earns a high school diploma or its equivalent.

(c) A month in which a recipient participates in the program pursuant to this section shall not be counted as a month of receipt of aid for the purposes of subdivision (a) of, and paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of, Section 11454.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 615, Sec. 6.   (SB 521)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

11333.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), counties shall contract for the provision of intensive case management services, as described in subdivision (b) of Section 11331.7 and in Section 11332.5, with public or nonprofit agencies or school districts that administer services pursuant to one or more of the following intensive case management models:

(1) The Adolescent Family Life Program (Article 1 (commencing with Section 124175) of Chapter 4 of Part 2 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code).

(2) A home visiting model approved by the department for the CalWORKs Home Visiting Program established pursuant to Article 3.4 (commencing with Section 11330.6), with priority on models that have demonstrated relevance serving the Cal-Learn population.

(3) Evidence-based home visiting models as identified by the United States Department of Health and Human Services that serve the specific demographic of Cal-Learn.

(b) In cases where services from contractors administering one or more of the models specified in subdivision (a) are not available or cost effective, counties may contract with other public or nonprofit agencies or school districts for intensive case management services or provide intensive
 case management services directly if all the following conditions are met:

(1) The department has determined that the proposed intensive case management model conforms with the standards and scope of services of an evidence-based model of the Adolescent Family Life Program, meets the same criteria as an evidence-based model identified by the United States Department of Health and Human Services, HomVEE review, or conforms to an intensive case management model specified or required by the department.

(2) The submitted county plan is determined by the department to sufficiently document that a model specified in subdivision (a) is not available or cost effective.

(3) The county has consulted with applicable local health agencies to assist in the implementation of the provision of services provided in the intensive case management model.

(c) Counties shall include approved contractors pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) in their planning of the Cal-Learn Program to ensure participation in the county’s planning and implementation of the Cal-Learn program.

(d) The department shall consult with the State Department of Public Health to implement the purposes of this program.

(e) It is the intent of the Legislature to review the implementation of the changes to this section enacted by the act that added this subdivision during the course of the 2020–21 fiscal year to determine how these changes impact service delivery and counties’ ability to maintain service levels as they existed in 2019–20 and prior to these changes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 11, Sec. 56.   (AB 79)   Effective June 29, 2020.   Note: Former Section 11334.8 was last amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 439, before its repeal on April 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

11333.5.

(a) Counties shall develop linkages with local service providers that serve teenage parents.

(b) The county plan shall specifically describe those required services that are available to teenage parents, as follows:

(1) An identification of available services to teenagers.

(2) The extent to which these programs are currently serving AFDC recipients.

(3) The resources that these programs may make available to GAIN participants.

(4) The linkages established with these programs.

(c) The department shall review each county’s plan to determine both of the following:

(1) Whether the intensity of case management services provided by the county meets the requirements of subdivision (b) of Section 11331.7.

(2) Whether the availability of services to teenagers is adequate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 902, Sec. 43.   Effective January 1, 1999.   As prescribed in former Section 11334.8, this section (as part of Article 3.5) resumed full operation on April 1, 2013, after a period of inoperation or limited operation.   Note: Former Section 11334.8 was last amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 439, before its repeal on April 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

11333.7.

(a) A participating or exempt student, as described in Section 11331.5, or a deferred student, as described in Section 11332, shall, not more than four times in a calendar year, receive a one-hundred-dollar ($100) supplement to the amount of aid paid pursuant to Section 11450.

(b) A participant required to participate pursuant to Section 11333.5 who successfully completes high school or a California high school equivalency examination shall receive a five-hundred-dollar ($500) supplement. An assistance unit shall not receive a one-hundred-dollar ($100) supplement when a five-hundred-dollar ($500) supplement for the same report card or progress report is paid. The five-hundred-dollar ($500) supplement shall be paid to the teen in the month following submission of the record of completion, if received by the county no later than the 11th calendar day of the month, or in the second month following submission of the record of completion, if received by the county after the 11th calendar day of the month.

(c) (1) For purposes of this
 section, in a school that provides periodic report cards with letter grades, satisfactory progress means maintaining a grade point average of at least 2.0 on a scale on which A equals 4.0 points and F equals 0 points, and adequate progress means maintaining a grade point average of at least 1.0 on the same scale.
